Wyoming, session 2025, HB0083.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 20-2-201(a) by creating a new
paragraph (x) and by renumbering (x) as (xi) and 20-2-202
by creating a new subsection (b) are amended to read:
20-2-201. Disposition and maintenance of children in
decree or order; access to records.
(a) In granting a divorce, separation or annulment of
a marriage or upon the establishment of paternity pursuant
to W.S. 14-2-401 through 14-2-907, the court may make by
decree or order any disposition of the children that
appears most expedient and in the best interests of the
children. In determining the best interests of the child,
the court shall consider, but is not limited to, the
following factors:
(x) Whether either parent has a conviction for
which the parent must register as a sex offender under W.S.
7-19-301 through 7-19-310;
(x)(xi) Any other factors the court deems
necessary and relevant.
20-2-202. Visitation.
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0083
ENROLLED ACT NO. 60, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(b) When considering an order for visitation, there
shall be a rebuttable presumption that it is not in the
best interests of a child to grant unsupervised visitation
to a parent who is required to register as a sex offender
under W.S. 7-19-301 through 7-19-310.
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
2